Minnesota, session 2025-2026, HF3274.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MINNESOTA: Section 1. new text begin [168.1289] DONATE LIFE SPECIAL PLATES. new text end new text begin Subdivision 1. new text end new text begin Issuance of plates. new text end new text begin The commissioner must issue Donate Life special plates or a single motorcycle plate to an applicant who: new text end new text begin (1) is a registered owner of a passenger automobile, noncommercial one-ton pickup truck, motorcycle, or recreational motor vehicle; new text end new text begin (2) pays an additional fee in the amount specified for special plates under section 168.12, subdivision 5; new text end new text begin (3) pays the registration tax as required under section 168.013; new text end new text begin (4) pays the fees required under this chapter; new text end new text begin (5) contributes a minimum of $10 annually to the Donate Life account; and new text end new text begin (6) complies with this chapter and rules governing registration of motor vehicles and licensing of drivers. new text end new text begin Subd. 2. new text end new text begin Design. new text end new text begin In consultation with Donate Life, the commissioner must adopt a suitable plate design that includes the Donate Life marks and colors. new text end new text begin Subd. 3. new text end new text begin Plates transfer. new text end new text begin On application to the commissioner and payment of a transfer fee of $5, special plates issued under this section may be transferred to another motor vehicle if the subsequent vehicle is: new text end new text begin (1) qualified under subdivision 1, clause (1), to bear the special plates; and new text end new text begin (2) registered to the same individual to whom the special plates were originally issued. new text end new text begin Subd. 4. new text end new text begin Exemption. new text end new text begin Special plates issued under this section are not subject to section 168.1293, subdivision 2. new text end new text begin Subd. 5. new text end new text begin Contributions; account; appropriation. new text end new text begin Contributions collected under subdivision 1, clause (5), must be deposited in the Donate Life account, which is established in the special revenue fund. Money in the account is annually appropriated to the commissioner. This appropriation is first for the annual cost of administering the account funds, and the remaining money is for distribution to Donate Life to further the organization's mission and purpose of promoting organ and tissue donation. new text end new text begin EFFECTIVE DATE. new text end new text begin This section is effective January 1, 2026, for Donate Life special plates issued on or after that date. new text end